Utah statutes.
72-4-130.   State highways -- SR-241, SR-243, SR-244, SR-248.
State highways include:
(1)  SR-241.  From SR-114 east on 1600 North in Orem to the on- and off-ramps
on the east side of interstate Route 15.
(2)  SR-243.  From Route 89 in Logan Canyon to Beaver Mountain Ski Resort.
(3)  SR-244.  From Route 6 in Helper easterly on Poplar Street to Main Street;
then northerly on Main Street to Route 6.
(4)  SR-248.  From Route 224 at Park City Junction to Route 40 at the Park
City Interchange; then southeasterly and easterly to Route 32 in Kamas.
